Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-176
Director; jurisdiction of proceedings; grounds for denial of credential.

(1) The director shall have jurisdiction of proceedings (a) to deny the issuance of a credential, (b) to refuse renewal of a credential, and (c) to discipline a credential holder.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 38-1,119, if an applicant for an initial credential or for renewal of a credential to practice a profession does not meet all of the requirements for the credential, the department shall deny issuance or renewal of the credential.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 76.